Wyoming, session 2025, HB0306.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-402(c), 9-3-101(d), 9-3-210(a)
and (b), 9-3-211(a), 9-3-413 and 9-3-413.1(b)(intro) are
amended to read:

9-1-402. State auditor; duties generally.

(c) The state auditor shall be the state payroll
officer, shall maintain the official payroll for all state
HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
agencies, excluding the University of Wyoming, and shall
supervise the issuance of all payroll warrants. The state
auditor may enter into agreement with any state agency to
maintain the official payroll and supervise issuance of all
payroll warrants for the state agency. The state auditor
may establish the frequency in which state and employee
insurance remittances and contributions and retirement
contributions are made to account for the semimonthly pay
periods authorized in W.S. 9-3-101(d).

9-3-101. Salaries; amount; date of payment.

(d) Except for employees paid hourly, or by hard copy
payroll check, as determined by the state auditor's office,
overtime and shift differential pay and employees and
officers of the University of Wyoming, state employees and
officers on automatic payroll direct deposit shall be paid
on the last working day of the month or semimonthly for
wages earned during that month or during the immediately
preceding semimonthly pay period. Hourly pay shall be paid
to state employees on automatic payroll direct deposit on
the last working day of the month or semimonthly for wages
earned from during the sixteenth day of the immediately
HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
preceding month through the fifteenth day of the current
month monthly or semimonthly pay period. Overtime and shift
differential pay shall be paid to state employees on
automatic payroll direct deposit no later than the last
working day of the month or the payment date immediately
following the month semimonthly pay period in which
overtime and shift differential pay was earned. Employees
and officers paid by hard copy payroll check shall have
their each payroll check mailed and post marked not later
than the last working day of the month payment date
specified in this subsection. State employees may elect to
be paid semimonthly on the sixteenth day of each month, or
the working day immediately preceding the sixteenth day of
the month, and on the last working day of each month, by
providing notice to the state auditor in a form and manner
determined by the state auditor. The state auditor shall
promulgate rules to provide for state employees to elect to
be paid semimonthly. Rules promulgated under this
subsection shall include limitations on how and when state
employees may change from monthly pay to semimonthly pay or
semimonthly pay to monthly pay. The University of Wyoming
is exempt from this subsection.

HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
9-3-210. Amount of state's contribution; estimates
submitted to state budget officer; specified employees
participation in federal program; participating employers
contributions.

(a) Except for voluntary participating employers,
volunteer firefighters, volunteer emergency medical
technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons under
W.S. 9-3-220, the state shall contribute monthly or
semimonthly, as determined by the state auditor under W.S.
9-1-402(c), the amount established and appropriated by the
legislature for each employee and official enrolled in the
plan in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this
section.

(b) Any state agency, department or institution,
including the University of Wyoming and the community
colleges in the state, shall pay monthly or semimonthly, as
determined by the state auditor under W.S. 9-1-402(c), to
the department the amount established and appropriated by
the legislature for each eligible employee or official
electing to become covered by any portion of the group
insurance plan as the contribution of the state to that
HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
plan during the period the employee or official is enrolled
in the plan. Amounts appropriated by the legislature from
the general fund for University of Wyoming and community
college employer contributions under this section shall
include amounts necessary to fully fund the employer's
contribution for those eligible and enrolled employees
whose compensation is partially or fully funded from
nonfederal sources, but the University of Wyoming shall
exclude amounts necessary to fully fund the employer's
contribution for those eligible and enrolled employees
whose compensation is partially or fully funded from
contracts, grants and auxiliary services. If federal funds
are not available, the amounts necessary to fully fund the
employer's contribution for those eligible and enrolled
employees shall be included in the general fund
appropriation. If the monthly premium for coverage of the
employee or official is less than the amount established
and appropriated by the legislature, the balance may be
applied to the premium for coverage of dependents, or to
the premium for any optional group insurance coverage made
available by the department, if so elected.

HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
9-3-211. Deductions from salaries of monthly or
semimonthly contributions by employees and officials;
establishment of procedure.

(a) The amount of monthly or semimonthly contribution
to be made by eligible employees and officials, excluding
volunteer firefighters, volunteer emergency medical
technicians and volunteer search and rescue persons under
W.S. 9-3-220, enrolled in the group insurance plan for
themselves and their dependents shall be deducted from the
monthly or semimonthly salaries of the employees and
officials by the various agencies or voluntary
participating employers and remitted to the department. The
procedure for deductions and remittances shall be
established by the department, in consultation with the
state auditor regarding the frequency for remittances
established under W.S. 9-1-402(c). If a flexible benefits
plan is chosen, the employees' and officials' contribution
shall be applied to the chosen benefits in an amount
determined by the employee or official.

HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
9-3-413. Employer's contributions; payable monthly;
transfer to account; interest imposed upon delinquent
contributions; recovery.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV),
9-3-431 and 9-3-432, each employer, excluding employers of
firefighter members, shall, on a monthly or semimonthly
basis, as determined by the state auditor under W.S.
9-1-402(c), pay into the account a contribution equal to
nine and thirty-seven hundredths percent (9.37%) of the
salary paid to each of its members covered under this
article for the period from July 1, 2021 through June 30,
2026 and thereafter a percentage of the salary paid as
determined in accordance with W.S. 9-3-413.1. Employers of
firefighter members shall pay into the account a
contribution equal to seven and twelve hundredths percent
(7.12%) of the salary paid. Employer contributions for any
month, together with the members' contributions for that
month, if any, shall be transferred to the board not later
than the twelfth day of the following month or, if deducted
from salary on a semimonthly basis, in two (2) equal
transfers to the board not later than the twelfth day and
the twenty-fourth day of the following month. These
HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
contributions shall be credited to the account in a manner
as directed by the board. Any employer failing to transfer
contributions under this section in sufficient time for the
board to receive the contributions by the twenty-fifth day
of the month due shall be assessed interest at the assumed
rate of return as determined by the board, compounded
annually. Interest imposed under this section shall be
payable not later than the twelfth day of the next
succeeding month. If the contributions and any interest
imposed under this section are not transferred to the board
when due, they may be recovered, together with court costs,
in an action brought for that purpose in the first judicial
district court in Laramie County, Wyoming.

9-3-413.1. Members' and employers' contributions
based on actuarially determined contribution rates;
calculation of rates; reports.

(b) The actuarially determined contribution rate
shall be paid through monthly or semimonthly contributions,
as determined by the state auditor in accordance with W.S.
9-1-402(c), into the account as follows:

HB0306

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0355
Section 2. The state auditor, the department of
administration and information, the Wyoming retirement
system, the legislative service office, the Wyoming
judicial branch and any other affected state agency shall
take any action before July 1, 2027 necessary to implement
this act on July 1, 2027.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2027.

(END)
HB0306